Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB813.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 303 of the act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971, is amended by adding a subsection to read:Section 303. Classes of Income.--* * *(a.13) The following apply:(1) The following shall not be subject to tax under this article:1234567891011121314151617181920 (i) The discharge of an eligible student loan under a qualified loan forgiveness program.(ii) Amounts paid or incurred by an employer of an employe for educational assistance provided to an employe that are excludable under section 127 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 (26 U.S.C. § 127).(2) For the purposes of this subsection:(i) "Eligible student loan" shall mean a student loan issued pursuant to 20 U.S.C. Ch. 28 Subch. IV (relating to student assistance).(ii) "Qualified loan forgiveness program" means a loan forgiveness program established under 34 CFR Subt. B Ch. VI (relating to Office of Postsecondary Education, Department of Education).* * *Section 2. The addition of section 303(a.13) of the act shall apply to taxable years beginning after December 31, 2025.Section 3. This act shall take effect immediately.20250HB0813PN0843 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718